Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.420

Allocation of all appropriated funds.

The secretary of health shall allocate all appropriated funds to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 171; 1983 c 71 s 3. Formerly RCW 18.72.400.]